Wisconsin, session 2025, SB685.
do enact as follows:SB685,11Section 1. 18.08 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,2,7218.08 (1) (a) (intro.) All moneys resulting from the contracting of public debt 3or any payment to be received with respect to any agreement or ancillary 4arrangement entered into under s. 18.06 (8) (a) with respect to any such public debt 5and any moneys transferred under s. 20.370 (5) (hq) or (hr) shall be credited to a 6separate and distinct fund, established in the state treasury, designated as the 7capital improvement fund, except that:SB685,28Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 9insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB685,35Section 3. 20.370 (5) (hq) of the statutes is renumbered 20.370 (7) (hs) and 6amended to read:SB685,3,11720.370 (7) (hs) Department land acquisition — conservation fund. From 8Biennially, from the conservation fund, from the moneys received by the 9department for forestry activities, the amounts in the schedule for transfer to the 10capital improvement fund the purposes specified in s. 23.09 (2) (d), excluding major 11land acquisitions under s. 23.09175.SB685,412Section 4. 20.370 (5) (hr) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,3,151320.370 (5) (hr) County forest grants. From the moneys received by the 14department for forestry activities, the amounts in the schedule for transfer to the 15capital improvement fund grants to counties under s. 23.0953.SB685,516Section 5. 20.370 (5) (hs) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,3,191720.370 (5) (hs) Department property development. From the moneys received 18by the department for forestry activities, the amounts in the schedule for the 19purposes under s. 23.0917 (4) (c).SB685,620Section 6. 20.370 (5) (ht) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,4,22120.370 (5) (ht) Nonprofit conservation organization grants — land acquisition. 22From the moneys received by the department for forestry activities, the amounts in 1the schedule for grants to nonprofit conservation organizations for the purpose 2under s. 23.096 (2) (a) 2.SB685,73Section 7. 20.370 (5) (hu) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,4,7420.370 (5) (hu) Nonprofit conservation organization grants — habitat 5restoration. From the moneys received by the department for forestry activities, the 6amounts in the schedule for grants to nonprofit conservation organizations for the 7purpose under s. 23.096 (2) (a) 1.SB685,88Section 8. 20.370 (5) (hv) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,4,11920.370 (5) (hv) Local assistance grants. From the moneys received by the 10department for forestry activities, the amounts in the schedule for local assistance 11grants under ss. 23.09 (19), (20), and (20m) and 30.277.SB685,912Section 9. 20.370 (7) (aa) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,5,51320.370 (7) (aa) Resource acquisition and development — principal repayment 14and interest. A sum sufficient to reimburse s. 20.866 (1) (u) for the payment of 15principal and interest costs incurred in financing the placement of structures and 16fill under s. 30.203, in financing the acquisition, construction, development, 17enlargement, or improvement of state recreation facilities under s. 20.866 (2) (tp) 18and (tr), in financing state aids for land acquisition and development of local parks 19under s. 20.866 (2) (tq), in financing land acquisition activities under s. 20.866 (2) 20(ts) and (tt), in financing the aid program for dams under s. 20.866 (2) (tx), in 21financing ice age trail development under s. 20.866 (2) (tw), in financing the Warren 22Knowles-Gaylord Nelson stewardship program under s. 20.866 (2) (tz) and in 23financing the Warren Knowles-Gaylord Nelson stewardship 2000 program under s. 2420.866 (2) (ta), in financing the major land acquisitions program under s. 20.866 (2) 1(tj), and to make payments under an agreement or ancillary arrangement entered 2into under s. 18.06 (8) (a). Payments may not be made from this appropriation 3account for principal and interest costs incurred in financing land acquisition and 4development of state forests under ss. 20.866 (2) (ta) and (tz) until all moneys 5available under par. (au) have been expended.SB685,106Section 10. 20.370 (7) (ae) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,5,12720.370 (7) (ae) Grant reimbursement - principal repayment. All moneys 8received from nonprofit conservation organizations and governmental units under 9s. 23.09 (18r) (b) 5. to reimburse s. 20.866 (1) (u) for the payment of principal on 10outstanding public debt incurred under the Warren Knowles-Gaylord Nelson 11stewardship 2000 program under s. 23.0917 and to make payments under an 12agreement or ancillary arrangement entered into under s. 18.06 (8) (a).SB685,1113Section 11. 20.370 (7) (fd) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,5,161420.370 (7) (fd) Resource acquisition and development — major land 15acquisitions program. Biennially, the amounts in the schedule for the major land 16acquisitions program under s. 23.09175.SB685,1217Section 12. 20.866 (2) (ta) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,6,161820.866 (2) (ta) Natural resources; Warren Knowles-Gaylord Nelson 19stewardship 2000 program. From the capital improvement fund a sum sufficient 20for the Warren Knowles-Gaylord Nelson stewardship 2000 program under s. 2123.0917. The state may contract public debt in an amount not to exceed 22$1,046,250,000 for this program. The state may contract additional public debt in 23an amount up to $42,600,000 for this program. The state may contract additional 24public debt in an amount up to $90,000,000. The state may contract additional 1public debt in an amount up to $53,000,000. Except as provided in s. 23.0917 (4g) 2(b), (4m) (k), (5), (5g), and (5m), the amounts obligated, as defined in s. 23.0917 (1) 3(e), under this paragraph may not exceed $46,000,000 in fiscal year 2000-01, may 4not exceed $46,000,000 in fiscal year 2001-02, may not exceed $60,000,000 in each 5fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2002-03 and ending with fiscal year 2009-10, 6may not exceed $86,000,000 in fiscal year 2010-11, may not exceed $60,000,000 in 7fiscal year 2011-12, may not exceed $60,000,000 in fiscal year 2012-13, may not 8exceed $47,500,000 in fiscal year 2013-14, may not exceed $54,500,000 in fiscal year 92014-15, and may not exceed $33,250,000 in each fiscal year beginning with 2015-1016 and ending with fiscal year 2021-22. Except as provided in s. 23.0917 (4g) (b), 11(4m) (f) and (k), (5g), and (5m), the amounts obligated, as defined in s. 23.0917 (1) 12(e), under this paragraph cannot exceed $33,250,000 in each fiscal year beginning 13with fiscal year 2022-23 and ending with fiscal year 2025-26. Except as provided in 14s. 23.0917 (4g) (b), (4m) (f) and (k), (5g), and (5m), the amounts obligated, as defined 15in s. 23.0917 (1) (e), under this paragraph cannot exceed $13,250,000 in each fiscal 16year beginning with fiscal year 2027 and ending with fiscal year 2030.SB685,1317Section 13. 20.866 (2) (tj) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,6,211820.866 (2) (tj) Natural resources; major land acquisitions program. From the 19capital improvement fund, a sum sufficient for the major land acquisitions program 20under s. 23.09175. The state may contract public debt in an amount not to exceed 21$0 for this purpose. SB685,1422Section 14. 23.09 (19) (cg) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,7,22323.09 (19) (cg) The department may award grants from the appropriation 24under s. 20.370 (5) (hv) or 20.866 (2) (ta) for the acquisition of land or rights in land 1for urban green space under this subsection only for the purposes of nature-based 2outdoor recreation.SB685,153Section 15. 23.09 (20) (am) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,7,12423.09 (20) (am) Any governmental unit may apply for state aids for the 5acquisition and development of recreational lands and rights in lands. State aids 6under this subsection that are expended from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (5) 7(hv) or 20.866 (2) (ta) may only be used for nature-based outdoor recreation. State 8aids received by a municipality shall be used for the development of its park system 9in accordance with priorities based on comprehensive plans submitted with the 10application and consistent with the outdoor recreation program under s. 23.30. An 11application under this subsection shall be made in the manner the department 12prescribes.SB685,1613Section 16. 23.09 (20m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,7,191423.09 (20m) (b) The department shall establish a program to award grants 15from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (5) (hv) or 20.866 (2) (ta) to governmental 16units and nonprofit conservation organizations to acquire development rights in 17land for nature-based outdoor recreation. Except as provided in s. 23.096 (2m), the 18grants shall be limited to no more than 50 percent of the acquisition costs of the 19development rights.SB685,1720Section 17. 23.09175 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB685,7,232123.09175 (2m) Appropriations. The department cannot use moneys from an 22appropriation under s. 20.370 (5) (hr), (ht), (hu), or (hv) or (7) (hs) for major land 23acquisitions.SB685,1824Section 18. 23.0953 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB685,8,4123.0953 (2) (b) Grants under this section shall be awarded from the 2appropriation under s. 20.866 (2) (ta), and, for purposes of s. 23.0917, shall be 3treated as moneys obligated from the subprogram under s. 23.0917 (3) 20.370 (5) 4(hr). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb685 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb685 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB685 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB685 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB685: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting